Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1017.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-226.5, add
(2)(c)(III) as follows:
24-75-226.5. ARPA refinance state money cash fund - creation
- reduction in general fund appropriations - legislative intent -
definitions - repeal. (2) (c) (III) WITHIN THREE DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c)(III), THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER FROM THE REFINANCE DISCRETIONARY ACCOUNT TO THE
HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
10-16-1206 (1), THE UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED BALANCE OF
MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT THAT DID NOT ORIGINATE FROM THE MONEY THE
STATE RECEIVED FROM THE CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1206, amend
(1)(g) and (1)(h); and add (1)(i) as follows:
10-16-1206. Health insurance affordability cash fund -
creation. (1) There is created in the state treasury the health insurance
affordability cash fund. The fund consists of:
(g) The federal share of the medical assistance payments received
pursuant to section 25.5-4-503 (2); and
(h) Gifts, grants, or donations received from private or public
-2- HB25B-1017

sources; AND
(i) ANY OTHER MONEY THAT MAY BE APPROPRIATED OR
TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-3- HB25B-1017